Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Burglary and Criminal Trespass.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Burglary, § 1 et seq.

75 Am. Jur. 2d, Trespass, § 1 et seq.

12A C.J.S., Burglary, § 1 et seq.

87 C.J.S., Trespass, § 1 et seq.

Outbuilding or the like as part of “dwelling house,” 43 ALR2d 831.

Gambling or lottery paraphernalia as subject of larceny, burglary, or robbery, 51 ALR2d 1396.

Sufficiency of showing that burglary was committed at night, 82 ALR2d 643.

Provisions of burglary or theft policy as to “visible marks” or “visible evidence,” 99 ALR2d 129.

Provisions of burglary or theft policy requiring losses evidenced by “physical damage to premises,” 22 ALR3d 1305.

Validity, construction and application of statutes relating to burglars’ tools, 33 ALR3d 798.

Breaking and entering of inner door of building as burglary, 43 ALR3d 1147.

Criminal prosecution based upon breaking into or taking money or goods from vending machine or other coin operated machine, 45 ALR3d 1286.

What amounts to “exclusive” possession of stolen goods to support inference of burglary or other felonious taking, 51 ALR3d 727.

Entry through partly opened door or window as burglary, 70 ALR3d 881.

Coercion, compulsion, or duress as defense to charge of robbery, larceny, or related crime, 1 ALR4th 481.

Absence of occupant from residential structure affecting nature of offense as burglary or breaking and entering, 20 ALR4th 349.

Maintainability of burglary charge where entry into buildings is made with consent, 58 ALR4th 335.

What is “building” or “house” within burglary or breaking and entering statutes, 68 ALR4th 425.

Burglary, breaking, or entering of motor vehicle, 72 ALR4th 710.

Sec. 11.46.300.
Burglary in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of burglary in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.46.310

and

the building is a dwelling; or

in effecting entry or while in the building or immediate flight from the building, the person

is armed with a firearm;

causes or attempts to cause physical injury to a person; or

uses or threatens to use a dangerous instrument.

Burglary in the first degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.310.
Burglary in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of burglary in the second degree if the person enters or remains unlawfully in a building with intent to commit a crime in the building.

Burglary in the second degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “building,” “dwelling,” “firearm,” “physical injury,” “dangerous instrument” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “enter or remain unlawfully” - AS

11.46.350

Criminal trespass - AS

11.46.320

,

11.46.330

Defense: emergency use of premises - AS

11.46.340

Possession of burglary tools - AS

11.46.315

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.080

; AS 11.20.090; AS 11.20.100; AS 11.20.110; AS 11.20.120; AS 11.20.130.

TD III, 51-58.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.315.
Possession of burglary tools.

A person commits the crime of possession of burglary tools if the person possesses a burglary tool with intent to use or permit use of the tool in the commission of

burglary in any degree;

a crime referred to in AS

11.46.130(a)(3)

; or

theft of services.

As used in this section, “burglary tools” means

nitroglycerine, dynamite, or any other tool, instrument, or device adapted or designed for use in committing a crime referred to in (a)(1)-(3) of this section; or

any acetylene torch, electric arc, burning bar, thermal lance, oxygen lance, or other similar device capable of burning through steel, concrete, or other solid material.

Possession of burglary tools is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “possess” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Burglary in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.300

,

11.46.310

Theft in the second degree - AS

11.46.130(a)(3)

Theft of services - AS

11.46.200

Criminal possession of explosives - AS

11.61.240

Original Code Provision - None.

TD: V, 115-116.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.61.230

. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 11.46.320.
Criminal trespass in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal trespass in the first degree if the person enters or remains unlawfully

on land with intent to commit a crime on the land; or

in a dwelling.

Criminal trespass in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 12 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For additional crime involving weapons committed during violation of this section, see
AS

11.61.200

.

Sec. 11.46.330.
Criminal trespass in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal trespass in the second degree if the person enters or remains unlawfully

in or upon premises; or

in a propelled vehicle.

Criminal trespass in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “dwelling,” “premises,” “propelled vehicle”- AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “enter or remain unlawfully” - AS

11.46.350

Burglary in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.300

—

11.46.310

Defense: emergency use of premises - AS

11.46.340

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.630; AS 11.20.135; AS 11.20.610; AS 11.20.630; AS 11.20.640; AS 11.20.650.

TD: III, 58-69.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provisions authorizing arrest without warrant in certain cases where the police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person has committed a crime under this section, see AS

12.25.030(b)

.

For additional crime involving weapons committed during violation of this section, see AS

11.61.200

.

Sec. 11.46.340.
Defense: emergency use of premises.

In a prosecution under AS

11.46.300

,

11.46.310

,

11.46.320

, or

11.46.330(a)(1)

, it is an affirmative defense that

the entry, use, or occupancy of premises or use of personal property on the premises is for an emergency in the case of immediate and dire need; and

as soon as reasonably practical after the entry, use, or occupancy, the person contacts the owner of the premises, the owner’s agent or, if the owner is unknown, the nearest state or local police agency, and makes a report of the time of the entry, use, or occupancy and any damage to the premises or personal property, unless notice waiving necessity of the report is posted on the premises by the owner or the owner’s agent.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “property,” “premises” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Burglary in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.300

—

11.46.310

Criminal trespass in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.320

,

11.46.330

Justification: necessity - AS

11.81.320

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.135.

Sec. 11.46.350.
Definition; privilege to enter or remain on unimproved land.

As used in AS

11.46.300

—

11.46.350

, unless the context requires otherwise, “enter or remain unlawfully” means to

enter or remain in or upon premises or in a propelled vehicle when the premises or propelled vehicle, at the time of the entry or remaining, is not open to the public and when the defendant is not otherwise privileged to do so;

fail to leave premises or a propelled vehicle that is open to the public after being lawfully directed to do so personally by the person in charge; or

enter or remain upon premises or in a propelled vehicle in violation of a provision in an order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

or issued under former AS 25.35.010(b) or 25.35.020.

For purposes of this section, a person who, without intent to commit a crime on the land, enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently unused land, which is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner designed to exclude intruders, is privileged to do so unless

notice against trespass is personally communicated to that person by the owner of the land or some other authorized person; or

notice against trespass is given by posting in a reasonably conspicuous manner under the circumstances.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 48 SLA 2014.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 168 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

Definition of “premises,” “propelled vehicle” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Burglary in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.300

,

11.46.310

Criminal trespass in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.320

,

11.46.330

Domestic violence protective orders - AS

18.66.100

et seq.

Arrest authority - AS

12.25.030

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.090; AS 11.20.110.

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.46.990

.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.